Nebraska, session 109, LB1065.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1065 LB1065
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 49-1701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1701 (1) Following each statewide election at which an amendment
to the Constitution of Nebraska is adopted Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, following each regular session of the
Legislature, the Revisor of Statutes shall compile an updated copy of the
Constitution of Nebraska, showing all sections as they exist at that time
and including notes after the end of each section as follows:
(a) For each section, the Revisor of Statutes shall provide a note
referencing the source of such section and any amendments thereto;
(b) If a section is declared unconstitutional or inoperative, in
whole or in part, by the final judgment of a federal court or the
Nebraska Supreme Court, the Revisor of Statutes shall provide a note to
that effect. The Attorney General shall assist the Revisor of Statutes in
complying with this subdivision by promptly notifying the Revisor of
Statutes when any section is declared unconstitutional or inoperative;
and
(c) For any section, the Revisor of Statutes may provide additional
notes at his or her discretion.
(2) Within ten calendar days after the board of state canvassers
completes the canvass of a statewide election at which an amendment to
the Constitution of Nebraska is adopted, the Revisor of Statutes shall
The Revisor of Statutes shall, within two days after the Legislature has
adjourned sine die, transmit the updated copy of the Constitution of
Nebraska as compiled under subsection (1) of this section to the
Secretary of State for his or her review to determine whether the updated
copy accurately reflects the text of the Constitution of Nebraska as it
exists at that time. If the Secretary of State determines that any
changes are necessary, he or she shall, within five days after receipt of
the updated copy, notify the Revisor of Statutes of the changes. The
Revisor of Statutes shall make such changes and then promptly return the
-2-

LB1065 LB1065
2026 2026
updated copy to the Secretary of State for further review. If the
Secretary of State determines that no changes are necessary or that all
necessary changes have been made by the Revisor of Statutes, the
Secretary of State shall promptly certify the updated copy as an accurate
reflection of the text of the Constitution of Nebraska as it exists at
that time and . The Secretary of State shall then transmit the certified
copy to the Clerk of the Legislature for distribution no later than ten
days after the Legislature has adjourned sine die.
(3) After receiving the certified copy of the Constitution of
Nebraska from the Secretary of State pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, the Clerk of the Legislature shall:
(a) Make the certified copy available in electronic form on the
Legislature’s website;
(b) Include the certified copy in the session laws compiled and
published pursuant to section 49-501.01; and
(c) Print pamphlets of the certified copy for distribution to the
public upon request.
(4) The certified copies printed by the Clerk of the Legislature
pursuant to subdivisions (3)(b) and (3)(c) of this section shall
constitute the official version of the Constitution of Nebraska and may
be cited as prima facie evidence of the law in all courts of this state.
(5) The Secretary of State shall maintain in his or her office a
copy of every edition of the Constitution of Nebraska certified pursuant
to this section.
(6) Following any other statewide general election regular session
of the Legislature, if the Revisor of Statutes determines that there have
been no changes to the text of the Constitution of Nebraska and no
changes to the notes required by subsection (1) of this section, the
Revisor of Statutes may decide not to compile an updated copy of the
Constitution of Nebraska for that year. If the Revisor of Statutes
decides not to compile an updated copy for the year, he or she shall
-3-

LB1065 LB1065
2026 2026
notify the Secretary of State and the Clerk of the Legislature of such
fact and shall transmit the updated copy to the Secretary of State for
his or her review and certification under subsection (2) and the Clerk of
the Legislature shall continue to use the most recent year’s certified
copy for purposes of subsection (3) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 49-1701, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-